Washington statutes.
RCW 11.114.120

Care of custodial property.

(1) A custodian shall, as soon as custodial property is made available to the custodian:

(a) Take control of custodial property;

(b) Register or record title to custodial property if appropriate; and

(c) Collect, hold, manage, invest, and reinvest custodial property.

(2) In dealing with custodial property, a custodian shall observe the standard of care applicable to fiduciaries under chapter 11.100 RCW. If a custodian has a special skill or expertise or is named custodian on the basis of representations of a special skill or expertise, the custodian shall use that skill or expertise. A custodian, in the custodian's discretion and without liability to the minor or the minor's estate, may retain any custodial property received from a transferor according to the same standards as apply to a fiduciary holding trust funds under RCW 11.100.060. However, the provisions of RCW 11.100.025, 11.100.040, and 11.100.140 shall not apply to a custodian.

(3) A custodian may invest in or pay premiums on life insurance or endowment policies on (a) the life of the minor only if the minor or the minor's estate is the sole beneficiary, or (b) the life of another person in whom the minor has an insurable interest only to the extent that the minor, the minor's estate, or the custodian in the capacity of custodian, is the irrevocable beneficiary.

(4) A custodian at all times shall keep custodial property separate and distinct from all other property in a manner sufficient to identify it clearly as custodial property of the minor. Custodial property consisting of an undivided interest is so identified if the minor's interest is held as a tenant in common and is fixed. Custodial property subject to recordation is so identified if it is recorded, and custodial property subject to registration is so identified if it is either registered, or held in an account designated, in the name of the custodian, followed in substance by the words: ". . . . . . as custodian for . . . . . . (name of minor) under the Washington uniform transfers to minors act."

(5) A custodian shall keep records of all transactions with respect to custodial property, including information necessary for the preparation of the minor's tax returns, and shall make them available upon request for inspection by a parent or legal representative of the minor or by the minor if the minor has attained the age of eighteen years.

[ 2006 c 204 s 4; 1991 c 193 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 204: See note following RCW 11.114.090.